California statutes. Penal Code
(b) (1) Commencing January 1, 2020, it is unlawful to import into this state for commercial purposes, to possess with intent to sell, or to sell within the state, the dead body, or a part or product thereof, of a crocodile or alligator.

(2) This subdivision does not authorize the importation or sale of any alligator or crocodilian species, or products thereof, that are listed as endangered under the federal Endangered Species Act, or to allow the importation or sale of any alligator or crocodilian species, or products thereof, in violation of federal law or international treaty to which the United States is a party.

(c) Commencing January 1, 2022, it is unlawful to import into this state for commercial purposes, to possess with intent to sell, or to sell within the state, the dead body, or any part or product thereof, of an iguana, skink, caiman, hippopotamus, or a Teju, Ring, or Nile lizard.

(d) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six months, or both that fine and imprisonment, for each violation.

(e) The prohibitions against importation for commercial purposes, possession with intent to sell, and sale of the species listed in this section are severable. A finding of the invalidity of any one or more prohibitions shall not affect the validity of any remaining prohibitions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 767, Sec. 1.   (AB 1260)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

653p.

It is unlawful to possess with the intent to sell, or to sell, within the state, the dead body, or any part or product thereof, of any species or subspecies of any fish, bird, mammal, amphibian, reptile, mollusk, invertebrate, or plant, the importation of which is illegal under the Federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (Title 16, United States Code Sec. 1531 et seq.) and subsequent amendments, or under the Marine Mammal Protection Act of 1972 (Title 16, United States Code Sec. 1361 et seq.), or which is listed in the Federal Register by the Secretary of the Interior pursuant to the above acts. The violation of any federal regulations adopted pursuant to the above acts shall
 also be deemed a violation of this section and shall be prosecuted by the appropriate state or local officials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 692.)
-------------------------------------------

653q.

It is unlawful to import into this state for commercial purposes, to possess with intent to sell, or to sell within the state, the dead body, or any part or product thereof, of any seal.

Any person who violates any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment in the county jail for not to exceed six months, or both such fine and imprisonment, for each violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1200.)
-------------------------------------------

653r.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 3 of Chapter 1557 of the Statutes of 1970, it shall be unlawful to possess with intent to sell, or to sell, within this state, after June 1, 1972, the dead body, or any part or product thereof, of any fish, bird, amphibian, reptile, or mammal specified in Section 653o or 653p.

Violation of this section constitutes a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------

653s.

(a) Any person who transports or causes to be transported for monetary or other consideration within this state, any article containing sounds of a live performance with the knowledge that the sounds thereon have been recorded or mastered without the consent of the owner of the sounds of the live performance is guilty of a public offense punishable as provided in subdivision (g) or (h).

(b) As used in this section and Section 653u:

(1) “Live performance” means the recitation, rendering, or playing of a series of musical, spoken, or other sounds in any audible sequence thereof.

(2) “Article” means
 the original disc, wire, tape, film, phonograph record, or other recording device used to record or master the sounds of the live performance and any copy or reproduction thereof which duplicates, in whole or in part, the original.

(3) “Person” means any individual, partnership, partnership member or employee, corporation, association, or corporation or association employee, officer, or director, limited liability company, or limited liability company manager or officer.

(c) In the absence of a written agreement or operation of law to the contrary, the performer or performers of the sounds of a live performance shall be presumed to own the right to record or master those sounds.

(d) For purposes of this section, a person who is authorized to maintain custody and control over business records reflecting the consent of
 the owner to the recordation or master recording of a live performance shall be a proper witness in any proceeding regarding the issue of consent.

Any witness called pursuant to this section shall be subject to all rules of evidence relating to the competency of a witness to testify and the relevance and admissibility of the testimony offered.

(e) This section shall neither enlarge nor diminish the rights and remedies of parties to a recording or master recording which they might otherwise possess by law.

(f) This section shall not apply to persons engaged in radio or television broadcasting or cablecasting who record or fix the sounds of a live performance for, or in connection with, broadcast or cable transmission and related uses in educational television or radio programs, for archival purposes, or for news programs or purposes if the
 recordation or master recording is not commercially distributed independent of the broadcast or cablecast by or through the broadcasting or cablecasting entity to subscribers or the general public.

(g) Any person who has been convicted of a violation of subdivision (a), shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or five years, or by a fine not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), or by both, if the offense involves the transportation or causing to be transported of not less than 1,000 articles described in subdivision (a).

(h) Any person who has been convicted of any other violation of subdivision (a) not described in subdivision (g) shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, or by a fine not to exceed fifty thousand
 dollars ($50,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment. A second or subsequent conviction under subdivision (a) not described in subdivision (g) shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not to exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(i) Every person who offers for sale or resale, or sells or resells, or causes the sale or resale, or rents, or possesses for these purposes, any article described in subdivision (a) with knowledge that the sounds thereon have been so recorded or mastered without the consent of the owner of the sounds of a live performance is guilty of a public offense.

(1) A violation of subdivision (i) involving not less than 100 of those articles shall be punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year or
 by a fine not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment. A second or subsequent conviction for the conduct described in this paragraph shall be punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or by both.

(2) A person who has been convicted of any violation of this subdivision not described in paragraph (1) shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six months or by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment. A second conviction for the conduct described in this paragraph shall be punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year or by a fine not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment. A third or subsequent conviction for the conduct described
 in this paragraph shall be punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 435.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

653t.

(a) A person commits a public offense if the person knowingly and maliciously interrupts, disrupts, impedes, or otherwise interferes with the transmission of a communication over an amateur or a citizen’s band radio frequency, the purpose of which communication is to inform or inquire about an emergency.

(b) For purposes of this section, “emergency” means a condition or circumstance in which an individual is or is reasonably believed by the person transmitting the communication to be in imminent danger of serious bodily injury, in which property is or is reasonably believed by the person transmitting the communication to be in imminent danger of extensive damage or destruction, or in
 which that injury or destruction has occurred and the person transmitting is attempting to summon assistance.

(c) A violation of subdivision (a) is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six months, or by both, unless, as a result of the commission of the offense, serious bodily injury or property loss in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) occurs, in which event the offense is a felony punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(d) Any person who knowingly and maliciously interrupts, disrupts, impedes, or otherwise interferes with the transmission of an emergency communication over a public safety radio frequency, when the offense results in serious bodily injury or property loss in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), is guilty of a felony punishable by
 imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 436.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

653u.

(a) Any person who records or masters or causes to be recorded or mastered on any article with the intent to sell for commercial advantage or private financial gain, the sounds of a live performance with the knowledge that the sounds thereon have been recorded or mastered without the consent of the owner of the sounds of the live performance is guilty of a public offense punishable as provided in subdivisions (d) and (e).

(b) In the absence of a written agreement or operation of law to the contrary, the performer or performers of the sounds of a live performance shall be presumed to own the right to record or master those sounds.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, a person who is authorized to maintain custody and control over business records reflecting the consent of the owner to the recordation or master recording of a live performance shall be a proper witness in any proceeding regarding the issue of consent.

(2) Any witness called pursuant to this section shall be subject to all rules of evidence relating to the competency of a witness to testify and the relevance and admissibility of the testimony offered.

(d) Any person who has been convicted of a violation of subdivision (a) shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or five years, or by a fine not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment, if the offense involves the recording,
 mastering, or causing to be recorded or mastered at least 1,000 articles described in subdivision (a).

(e) Any person who has been convicted of any other violation of subdivision (a) not described in subdivision (d), shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, or by a fine not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment. A second or subsequent conviction under subdivision (a) not described in subdivision (d) shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 or by a fine not to exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 437.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

653v.

Whenever any person is convicted of any violation of Section 653h, 653s, 653u, or 653w the court, in its judgment of conviction, shall, in addition to the penalty therein prescribed, order the forfeiture and destruction or other disposition of all articles, including, but not limited to, phonograph records, discs, wires, tapes, films, or any other article upon which sounds or images can be recorded or stored, and any and all electronic, mechanical, or other devices for manufacturing, reproducing or assembling these articles, which were used in connection with, or which were part of, any violation of Section 653h, 653s, 653u, or 653w.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 364, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

653w.

(a) (1) A person is guilty of failure to disclose the origin of a recording or audiovisual work if, for commercial advantage or private financial gain, he or she knowingly advertises or offers for sale or resale, or sells or resells, or causes the rental, sale, or resale of, or rents, or manufactures, or possesses for these purposes, any recording or audiovisual work, the outside cover, box, jacket, or label of which does not clearly and conspicuously disclose the actual true name and address of the manufacturer thereof and the name of the actual author, artist, performer, producer, programmer, or group thereon. This section does not require the original manufacturer or authorized licensees of software producers to disclose the contributing authors or programmers.

(2) As used in this section, “recording” means any tangible medium upon which information or sounds are recorded or otherwise stored, including, but not limited to, any phonograph record, disc, tape, audio cassette, wire, film, memory card, flash drive, hard drive, data storage device, or other medium on which information or sounds are recorded or otherwise stored, but does not include sounds accompanying a motion picture or other audiovisual work.

(3) As used in this section, “audiovisual works” are the physical embodiment of works that consist of related images that are intrinsically intended to be shown using machines or devices, such as projectors, viewers, or electronic equipment, together with accompanying sounds, if any, regardless of the nature of the material objects, such as films, tapes, discs, memory cards, flash drives, hard drives, data storage devices, or other devices,
 on which the works are embodied.

(b) A person who has been convicted of a violation of subdivision (a) shall be punished as follows:

(1) If the offense involves the advertisement, offer for sale or resale, sale, rental, manufacture, or possession for these purposes, of at least 100 articles of audio recordings or 100 articles of audiovisual works described in subdivision (a), or the commercial equivalent thereof, the person shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or five years, or by a fine not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(2) Any other violation of subdivision (a) not described in paragraph (1) shall, upon a first offense, be punished by
 imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, or by a fine not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(3) A second or subsequent conviction under subdivision (a) not described in paragraph (1) shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), but not to exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 181.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

653x.

(a) A person who telephones or uses an electronic communication device to initiate communication with the 911 emergency system with the intent to annoy or harass another person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment. Nothing in this section shall apply to telephone calls or communications using electronic devices made in good faith.

(b) An intent to annoy or harass is established by proof of repeated calls or communications over a period of time, however short, that are unreasonable under the circumstances.

(c) Upon conviction of a violation of this section, a person also shall be liable for all reasonable costs incurred by any unnecessary emergency response.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 1769)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

653y.

(a) A person who knowingly allows the use of or who uses the 911 emergency system for any reason other than because of an emergency is guilty of an infraction, punishable as follows:

(1) For a first violation, a written warning shall be issued to the violator by the public safety entity originally receiving the telephone call or the communication from an electronic device describing the punishment for subsequent violations. The written warning shall inform the recipient to notify the issuing agency that the warning was issued inappropriately if the recipient did not make, or knowingly allow the use of the 911 emergency system for, the nonemergency 911 telephone call or the communication from
 an electronic device. The law enforcement agency may provide educational materials regarding the appropriate use of the 911 emergency system.

(2) For a second or subsequent violation, a citation may be issued by the public safety entity originally receiving the telephone call or the communication from an electronic device pursuant to which the violator shall be subject to the following penalties that may be reduced by a court upon consideration of the violator’s ability to pay:

(A) For a second violation, a fine of fifty dollars ($50).

(B) For a third violation, a fine of one hundred dollars ($100).

(C) For a fourth or subsequent violation, a fine of two hundred and
 fifty dollars ($250).

(3) The parent or legal guardian having custody and control of an unemancipated minor who violates this section is jointly and severally liable with the minor for the fine imposed pursuant to this subdivision.

(b) Knowingly allowing the use of or using the 911 emergency system for the purpose of harassing another is a crime that is punishable as follows:

(1) For a first violation, as an infraction punishable by a two-hundred-fifty dollar ($250) fine or as a misdemeanor punishable by up to six months in a county jail, a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both that imprisonment and fine.

(2) For a second or subsequent
 violation, as a misdemeanor punishable by up to six months in a county jail, a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both that imprisonment and fine.

(c) If a person knowingly allows the use of or uses the 911 emergency system for the purpose of harassing another person and that act is an act described in Section 422.55 or 422.85, the person who commits the act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by up to one year in a county jail, a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), or both that imprisonment and fine.

(d) For purposes of this section, “emergency” means any condition in which emergency services will result in the saving of a life, a reduction in the destruction of property, quicker apprehension of criminals,
 or assistance with potentially life-threatening medical problems, a fire, a need for rescue, an imminent potential crime, or a similar situation in which immediate assistance is required.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section does not apply to a telephone corporation or any other entity for acts or omissions relating to the routine maintenance, repair, or operation of the 911 emergency system or the 311 telephone system.

(2) This section does not apply to uses of the 911 emergency system by a person with an intellectual disability or other mental disability that makes it difficult or impossible for the person to understand the potential consequences of their actions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 327, Sec. 4.   (AB 1775)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

653z.

(a) Every person who operates a recording device in a motion picture theater while a motion picture is being exhibited, for the purpose of recording a theatrical motion picture and without the express written authority of the owner of the motion picture theater, is guilty of a public offense and shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Recording device” means a photographic, digital or video camera, or
 other audio or video recording device capable of recording the sounds and images of a motion picture or any portion of a motion picture.

(2) “Motion picture theater” means a theater or other premises in which a motion picture is exhibited.

(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude prosecution under any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 351, Sec. 7.   (AB 819)   Effective September 27, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

653aa.

(a) Any person, except a minor, who is located in California, who, knowing that a particular recording or audiovisual work is commercial, knowingly electronically disseminates all or substantially all of that commercial recording or audiovisual work to more than 10 other people without disclosing his or her e-mail address, and the title of the recording or audiovisual work is punishable by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), imprisonment in a county jail for a period not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) Any minor who violates subdivision (a) is punishable by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500). Any minor who commits a third
 or subsequent violation of subdivision (a) is punishable by a fine not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), imprisonment in a county jail for a period not to exceed one year, or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply:

(1) To a person who electronically disseminates a commercial recording or audiovisual work to his or her immediate family, or within his or her personal network, defined as a restricted access network controlled by and accessible to only that person or people in his or her immediate household.

(2) If the copyright owner, or a person acting under the authority of the copyright owner, of a commercial recording or audiovisual work has explicitly given permission for all or substantially all of that recording or audiovisual work to be freely disseminated
 electronically by or to anyone without limitation.

(3) To a person who has been licensed either by the copyright owner or a person acting under the authority of the copyright owner to disseminate electronically all or substantially all of a commercial audiovisual work or recording.

(4) To the licensed electronic dissemination of a commercial audiovisual work or recording by means of a cable television service offered over a cable system or direct to home satellite service as defined in Title 47 of the United States Code.

(d) Nothing in this section shall restrict the copyright owner from disseminating his or her own copyrighted material.

(e) Upon conviction for a violation of this section, in addition to the penalty prescribed, the court shall order the
 permanent deletion or destruction of any electronic file containing a commercial recording or audiovisual work, the dissemination of which was the basis of the violation. This subdivision shall not apply to the copyright owner or to a person acting under the authority of the copyright owner.

(f) An Internet service provider does not violate, and does not aid and abet a violation of subdivision (a), and subdivision (a) shall not be enforced against an Internet service provider, to the extent that the Internet service provider enables a user of its service to electronically disseminate an audiovisual work or sound recording, if the Internet service provider maintains its valid e-mail address or other means of electronic notification on its Internet Web site in a location that is accessible to the public.

For the purposes of this section, “Internet service provider” means an entity, to the extent that the
 entity is transmitting, routing, or providing connections for Internet communications initiated by or at the direction of another person, between or among points specified by a user, of material placed online by a user, storing or hosting that material at the direction of a user, or referring or linking users to that material.

(g) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Recording” means the electronic or physical embodiment of any recorded images, sounds, or images and sounds, but does not include audiovisual works or sounds accompanying audiovisual works.

(2) “Audiovisual work” means the electronic or physical embodiment of motion pictures, television programs, video or computer games, or other audiovisual presentations that consist of related images that are intrinsically intended to be shown by the use of machines or
 devices such as projectors, viewers, or electronic equipment, or a computer program, software, or system, as defined in Section 502, together with accompanying sounds, if any.

(3) “Commercial recording or audiovisual work” means a recording or audiovisual work whose copyright owner, or assignee, authorized agent, or licensee, has made or intends to make available for sale, rental, or for performance or exhibition to the public under license, but does not include an excerpt consisting of less than substantially all of a recording or audiovisual work. A recording or audiovisual work may be commercial regardless of whether the person who electronically disseminates it seeks commercial advantage or private financial gain from that dissemination.

(4) “Electronic dissemination” means initiating a transmission of, making available, or otherwise offering, a commercial recording or
 audiovisual work for distribution on the Internet or other digital network, regardless of whether someone else had previously electronically disseminated the same commercial recording or audiovisual work.

(5) “E-mail address” means a valid e-mail address, or the valid e-mail address of the holder of the account from which the dissemination took place.

(6) “Disclosing” means providing information in, attached to, or discernable or available in or through the process of disseminating or obtaining a commercial recording or audiovisual work in a manner that is accessible by any person engaged in disseminating or receiving the commercial recording or audiovisual work.

(h) Nothing in this section shall preclude prosecution under any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 351, Sec. 8.   (AB 819)   Effective September 27, 2010.   Note: This amendment deleted the provision, in former subd. (i), that made this section inoperative on Jan. 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

653.1.

(a) No person or group shall release, outdoors, balloons made of electrically conductive material and filled with a gas lighter than air, as part of a public or civic event, promotional activity, or product advertisement.

(b) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of an infraction punishable by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100). Any person who violates this section who has been previously convicted twice of violating this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) This section shall not apply to manned hot air balloons, or to balloons used in governmental or scientific research projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 262, Sec. 2.   (AB 2450)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

653.2.

(a) Every person who, with intent to place another person in reasonable fear for his or her safety, or the safety of the other person’s immediate family, by means of an electronic communication device, and without consent of the other person, and for the purpose of imminently causing that other person unwanted physical contact, injury, or harassment, by a third party, electronically distributes, publishes,
 e-mails, hyperlinks, or makes available for downloading, personal identifying information, including, but not limited to, a digital image of another person, or an electronic message of a harassing nature about another person, which would be likely to incite or produce that unlawful action, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by up to one year in a county jail, by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) For purposes of this section, “electronic communication device” includes, but is not limited to, telephones, cell phones, computers, Internet Web pages or sites, Internet phones, hybrid cellular/Internet/wireless devices, personal digital assistants (PDAs), video recorders, fax machines, or pagers. “Electronic communication” has the same meaning as the term is defined in Section 2510(12) of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following terms apply:

(1) “Harassment” means a knowing and willful course of conduct directed at a specific person that a reasonable person would consider as seriously alarming, seriously annoying, seriously tormenting, or seriously terrorizing the person and that serves no legitimate purpose.

(2) “Of a harassing nature” means of a nature that a reasonable person would consider as seriously alarming, seriously annoying, seriously tormenting, or seriously terrorizing of the person and that serves no legitimate purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 144.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Loitering for the Purpose of Engaging in a Prostitution Offense [653.23. - 653.29.]

653.23.

(a) It is unlawful for a person to do either of the following:

(1) Direct, supervise, recruit, or otherwise aid another person in the commission of a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 647.

(2) Collect or receive all or part of the proceeds earned from an act or acts of prostitution committed by another person in violation of subdivision (b) of Section 647.

(b) Nothing in this section shall preclude the prosecution of a suspect for a violation of Section 266h or 266i or for any other offense, or for a violation of this
 section in conjunction with a violation of Section 266h or 266i or any other offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 86, Sec. 5.   (SB 357)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

653.24.

If any section, subdivision, sentence, clause, phrase, or portion of this chapter is for any reason held invalid or unconstitutional by any court of competent jurisdiction, that portion shall be deemed a separate, distinct, and independent provision, and that holding shall not affect the validity of the remaining portion of the chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 981, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

653.25.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to loiter in any public place with the intent to purchase commercial sex. This intent is evidenced by acting in a manner and under circumstances that openly demonstrate the purpose of inducing, enticing, or soliciting prostitution, or procuring another to commit prostitution such as circling an area in a motor vehicle and repeatedly beckoning to, contacting, or attempting to contact or stop pedestrians or other motorists, making unauthorized stops along known prostitution tracks, or engaging in other conduct indicative of soliciting to procure another to engage in commercial sex.

(b) A violation of this section shall, in addition to any other punishment, be punished by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000).
 Fines collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in the Survivor Support Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 82, Sec. 6.   (AB 379)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

653.26.

A violation of any provision of this chapter is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 981, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

653.28.

Nothing in this chapter or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 639) shall prevent a local governing body from adopting and enforcing laws consistent with these chapters relating to prostitution or prostitution-related activity. Where local laws duplicate or supplement this chapter or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 639), these chapters shall be construed as providing alternative remedies and not to preempt the field.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 981, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

653.29.

(a) (1) A person currently serving a sentence for a conviction of violating former Section 653.22, whether by trial or by open or negotiated plea, may petition for a recall or dismissal of sentence before the trial court that entered the judgment of conviction in the case to request resentencing or dismissal, and sealing, as applicable.

(2) Upon receiving a petition under paragraph (1), the court shall presume the petitioner satisfies the criteria in paragraph (1) unless the party opposing the petition proves by clear and convincing evidence that the petitioner does not satisfy the criteria. If the petitioner satisfies the criteria in paragraph (1), the court shall grant the petition to recall the sentence or dismiss the sentence because it is
 legally invalid and shall seal the conviction as legally invalid.

(b) (1) A person who has completed their sentence for a conviction of violating former Section 653.22, whether by trial or open or negotiated plea, may file an application before the trial court that entered the judgment of conviction in their case to have the conviction dismissed and sealed because the prior conviction is now legally invalid.

(2) The court shall presume the petitioner satisfies the criteria in paragraph (1) unless the party opposing the application proves by clear and convincing evidence that the petitioner does not satisfy the criteria in paragraph (1). Once the applicant satisfies the criteria in paragraph (1), the court shall seal the conviction as legally invalid.

(c) Unless requested by the applicant, no
 hearing is necessary to grant or deny an application filed under subdivision (b).

(d) If the court that originally sentenced the petitioner is not available, the presiding judge shall designate another judge to rule on the petition or application.

(e) Nothing in this section is intended to diminish or abrogate any rights or remedies otherwise available to the petitioner or applicant.

(f) The Judicial Council shall promulgate and make available all necessary forms to enable the filing of the petitions and applications provided in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 150.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Immigration Matters [653.55. - 653.61.]

653.55.

It is a misdemeanor for any person for compensation to knowingly make a false or misleading material statement or assertion of fact in the preparation of an immigration matter which statement or assertion is detrimentally relied upon by another. Such a misdemeanor is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1125.)
-------------------------------------------

653.56.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Compensation” means money, property, or anything else of value.

(b) “Immigration matter” means any proceeding, filing, or action affecting the immigration or citizenship status of any person which arises under immigration and naturalization law, executive order or presidential proclamation, or action of the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, the United States Department of State, or the United States Department of Labor.

(c) “Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association,
 other organization, or any employee or agent thereof.

(d) “Preparation” means giving advice on an immigration matter and includes drafting an application, brief, document, petition, or other paper, or completing a form provided by a federal or state agency in an immigration matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 210.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

653.57.

Any person violating the provisions of this chapter may be enjoined by any superior court of competent jurisdiction upon an action for injunction, brought by the Attorney General, or any district attorney, county counsel, city attorney, or city prosecutor in this state, and the superior court shall, after proof of violation, issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining such conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 999.)
-------------------------------------------

653.58.

Any person who intentionally violates any injunction issued pursuant to Section 653.57 shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation. Where the conduct constituting a violation is of a continuing nature, each day of such conduct is a separate and distinct violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1125.)
-------------------------------------------

653.59.
